Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1801.01
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act be construed as enabling the rights set forth in Article I, section 28, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 5.